South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 17-15-30(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) A circuit court judge must set or deny bond and determine conditions of release, pursuant to the provisions of this section, for a person charged with a crime that carries a maximum sentence of three years or more and who is suspected to be an alien unlawfully present in the United States. (D)(E) A court hearing these matters has contempt powers to enforce the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----